Ohio, session 136, SB244.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That section 5.63 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.63. The twenty-sixth day of August is designated as "Abbey Gate Remembrance Day" to honor hospital corpsman third class Maxton W. Soviak, United States Navy, of Berlin Heights, Ohio; lance corporal David L. Espinoza, United States Marine Corps, of Rio Bravo, Texas; sergeant Nicole L. Gee, United States Marine Corps, of Roseville, California; staff sergeant Darin T. Hoover, United States Marine Corps, of Salt Lake City, Utah; staff sergeant Ryan C. Knauss, United States Army, of Corryton, Tennessee; corporal Hunter Lopez, United States Marine Corps, of Indio, California; lance corporal Rylee J. McCollum, United States Marine Corps, of Jackson, Wyoming; corporal Dylan R. Merola, United States Marine Corps, of Rancho Cucamonga, California; lance corporal Kareem M. Nikoui, United States Marine Corps, of Norco, California; sergeant Johanny Rosario Pichardo, United States Marine Corps, of Lawrence, Massachusetts; corporal Humberto A. Sanchez, United States Marine Corps, of Logansport, Indiana; corporal Jared M. Schmitz, United States Marine Corps, of Saint Charles, Missouri; and corporal Daegan W. Page, United States Marine Corps, of Omaha, Nebraska: members of the United States Armed Forces who tragically lost their lives during an attack at the Abbey Gate of Hamid Karzai international airport in Kabul, Afghanistan, while supporting operation allies refuge in 2021. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________